Mississippi, session 2026, HB4162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Joe Nelson London of Lee County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Residential in Lee County, on June 17, 1983, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on November 7, 1985. On November 7, 1990, for the crime of Cocaine-Possession, he was sentenced to thirty-six (36) months of supervised probation under the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to discharge on November 8, 1993.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.